District of Columbia statutes.
2-559

Correction of errors in documents.

The Administrator of the District of Columbia Office of Documents shall correct grammatical or typographical errors in the publication of the text of a document in the District of Columbia Statutes-at-Large, the District of Columbia Register or the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations by the publication of an errata list or by publication of the entire document or the affected part of the document in its corrected form so as to indicate the actual corrections which were made.

History

Oct. 21, 1968, Pub. L. 90-614, title III, § 309
as added Mar. 6, 1979, D.C. Law 2-153, § 4, 25 DCR 6960
Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 1083(d), 57 DCR 6242

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1539.
1973 Ed., § 1-1539.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 18-223 substituted “publication” for “printing”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1083(d) of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).